District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.20

Report of injury.

(a)

The immediate superior of an employee shall report to the Mayor an injury to the employee that results in his or her death or probable injury within 3 days from the date of the injury or death or the date that the superior has knowledge of the injury, whichever is earlier.

(b)

Notwithstanding § 1-623.24(a)(1), failure of a superior to report an injury or death shall not impair a claimant’s right to compensation. The Mayor may:

(1)

Prescribe the information that the report shall contain;

(2)

Require the immediate superior to make supplemental reports; and

(3)

Obtain such additional reports and information from employees as are agreed on by the Mayor and the head of the employing agency.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2320, 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-290, § 2(c), 52 DCR 1449
1981 Ed., § 1-624.20.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.20.
D.C. Law 15-290 rewrote the section which had read:
“Immediately after an injury to an employee which results in his or her death or probable disability, his or her immediate superior shall report to the Mayor. The Mayor may:
“(1) Prescribe the information that the report shall contain;
“(2) Require the immediate superior to make supplemental reports; and
“(3) Obtain such additional reports and information from employees as are agreed on by the Mayor and the head of the employing agency.”